Utah statutes.
10-6-112.   Tentative budget and data -- Availability for public inspection.

Each tentative budget adopted by the governing body and all supporting schedules and data shall be a public record in the office of the city auditor or the city recorder, available for public inspection for a period of at least 10 days prior to the adoption of a final budget, as hereinafter provided.



Enacted by Chapter 26, 1979 General Session

